Missouri, session 2026, SB1445.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 195.070, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 195.070,
to read as follows:
195.070. 1. A physician, podiatrist, dentist, a
registered optometrist certified to administer
pharmaceutical agents as provided in section 336.220, or an
assistant physician in accordance with section 334.037 or a
physician assistant in accordance with section 334.747 in
good faith and in the course of his or her professional
practice only, may prescribe, administer, and dispense
controlled substances or he or she may cause the same to be
administered or dispensed by an individual as authorized by
statute.
2. An advanced practice registered nurse, as defined
in section 335.016, but not a certified registered nurse
anesthetist as defined in subdivision (8) of section
335.016, who holds a certificate of controlled substance
prescriptive authority from the board of nursing under
section 335.019 and who is delegated the authority to
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1445 2
prescribe controlled substances under a collaborative
practice arrangement under section 334.104 may prescribe any
controlled substances listed in Schedules III, IV, and V of
section 195.017, and may have restricted authority in
Schedule II. Prescriptions for Schedule II medications
prescribed by an advanced practice registered nurse who has
a certificate of controlled substance prescriptive authority
are restricted to only those medications containing
hydrocodone and Schedule II controlled substances for
hospice patients pursuant to the provisions of section
334.104. However, no such certified advanced practice
registered nurse shall prescribe controlled substance for
his or her own self or family. Schedule III narcotic
controlled substance and Schedule II - hydrocodone
prescriptions shall be limited to a one hundred twenty-hour
supply without refill.
3. A certified registered nurse anesthetist, as such
term is defined in section 335.016, may select, issue orders
for, and administer controlled substances listed in
Schedules II, III, IV, and V of section 195.017 for and
during the course of providing anesthesia care to a patient
in a licensed facility pursuant to state law. The
provisions of this subsection shall not be construed as
authorizing a certified registered nurse anesthetist to
prescribe such controlled substances. Notwithstanding any
other provision of law to the contrary, a certified
registered nurse anesthetist shall not be required to obtain
a certificate of controlled substance prescriptive authority
from the board of nursing under section 335.019 in order to
exercise the authority provided by this subsection.
4. A veterinarian, in good faith and in the course of
the veterinarian's professional practice only, and not for

SB 1445 3
use by a human being, may prescribe, administer, and
dispense controlled substances and the veterinarian may
cause them to be administered by an assistant or orderly
under his or her direction and supervision.
[4.] 5. A practitioner shall not accept any portion of
a controlled substance unused by a patient, for any reason,
if such practitioner did not originally dispense the drug,
except:
(1) When the controlled substance is delivered to the
practitioner to administer to the patient for whom the
medication is prescribed as authorized by federal law.
Practitioners shall maintain records and secure the
medication as required by this chapter and regulations
promulgated pursuant to this chapter; or
(2) As provided in section 195.265.
[5.] 6. An individual practitioner shall not prescribe
or dispense a controlled substance for such practitioner's
personal use except in a medical emergency.
✓